Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.110

Criminal penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter other than RCW 19.146.050 or any rule or order of the director is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 159; 1993 c 468 s 20; 1987 c 391 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.